Utah statutes.
26-18-12.   Expansion of 340B drug pricing programs.

(1)  The department shall, in accordance with this section, expand the state Medicaid program's use of savings under the 340B drug pricing program.

(2)  The department shall:

(a)  determine:

(i)  the feasibility of developing and implementing one or more 340B drug pricing programs for a specific disease, similar to the department's hemophilia disease management services; and

(ii)  whether the 340B drug program for a specific disease results in greater savings for the department than other drug management programs for the particular disease;

(b)  report by May 21, 2008 to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee and Social Services Appropriations Subcommittee regarding:

(i)  potential cost savings to the state Medicaid program from expansion of the use of 340B drug pricing programs;

(ii)  state Medicaid plan amendments or waivers necessary to implement increased use of 340B drug pricing programs by the state Medicaid program; and

(iii)  projected implementation of the 340B drug pricing programs identified under the provisions of Subsection (2)(a);

(c)  work with the Association for Utah Community Health to identify and assist community clinics that do not have 340B drug pricing programs to determine whether, under applicable federal law:

(i)  the patients of the community health center would benefit from establishing a 340B drug pricing program either on site, or through a contract with a pharmacy provider; and

(ii)  the community health center can provide the 340B drug price savings to the community health center's Medicaid patients; and

(d)  beginning May 21, 2008, report on a quarterly basis to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee and Social Services Appropriations Subcommittee on the department's progress towards implementing an expansion of the use of the 340B drug pricing program by community health centers.

(3)  If the department needs a Medicaid waiver to implement a 340B drug program for a specific disease, the department shall comply with the reporting requirements of Subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section, and the reporting requirements of Section 26-18-3.

(4)  This section shall sunset in accordance with Section 63I-1-226.

